Utah statutes.
17-22-20.   Only written directions to sheriff binding.

No direction or authority by a party or his attorney to the sheriff in respect to the execution of process or the return thereof or to any act or omission relating thereto is available to discharge or excuse the sheriff from liability for neglect or misconduct, unless it is contained in a writing, signed by the attorney of the party or by the party, if he has no attorney.

